fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VTA-i_IMP_PL
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>âtân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;


!! End lexica

LEXICON VERBS_Endlex
@D.bound@ VERBS_Endlex_Morph ;
! @R.bound.h2@:@R.bound.h2@+Orth/Hyph # ;

LEXICON VERBS_Endlex_Morph
@R.err.Morph@+Err/Morph:@R.err.Morph@ # ;
@D.err.Morph@ # ;
